Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1903.01
Law enforcement agency; powers and duties.

A state or local law enforcement agency which has custody of a motor vehicle for investigatory purposes and has no further need to keep it in custody shall send a certified letter to each of the last-registered owners, if any, and lienholders, if any, within fifteen calendar days stating that the vehicle is in the custody of the law enforcement agency, that the vehicle is no longer needed for law enforcement purposes, and that after thirty days the agency will dispose of the vehicle. This section shall not apply to motor vehicles subject to forfeiture under section 28-431. No storage fees shall be assessed against the registered owner of a motor vehicle held in custody for investigatory purposes under this section unless the registered owner or the person in possession of the vehicle when it is taken into custody is charged with a felony or misdemeanor related to the offense for which the law enforcement agency took the vehicle into custody. If a registered owner or the person in possession of the vehicle when it is taken into custody is charged with a felony or misdemeanor but is not convicted, the registered owner shall be entitled to a refund of the storage fees.

Laws 1999, LB 90, § 4;

Laws 2021, LB616, § 4.